Maryland, session 2026, HB1390.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–103.
(c) (1) The following days are public school holidays:
(i) Thanksgiving Day and the day after;
(ii) Christmas Eve and from then through January 1;
(iii) Martin Luther King, Jr. Day;
(iv) Presidents’ Day;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1390*

HOUSE BILL 1390
(v) The Friday before Easter and from then through the Monday
after Easter;
(vi) Memorial Day; and
(vii) Primary and general election days.
(2) If the federal and State observances of a holiday are on different days,
the board of education of each county shall determine which date shall be the date of
observance for the public schools within the county.
(3) The public schools shall devote a part of at least one day to appropriate
exercises for each of the following:
(i) Washington’s Birthday;
(ii) Lincoln’s Birthday;
(iii) Veterans’ Day;
(iv) Columbus Day;
(v) Arbor Day;
(vi) Black History Month, with an emphasis on Harriet Tubman and
Frederick Douglass and the contributions they made in the fight against slavery; and
(vii) Any other day of national significance.
(4) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE,
PUBLIC SCHOOLS SHALL EXCUSE ANY STUDENT’S ABSENCE FROM SCHOOL FOR
OBSERVANCE OF VETERANS’ DAY.
[(4)] (5) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this article, the public
schools, in the following counties, may remain open and in session on primary and general
election days:
(i) Calvert;
(ii) Caroline;
(iii) Dorchester;
(iv) Kent;
(v) Talbot; and

HOUSE BILL 1390 3
(vi) Worcester.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.